trunk/apertium-mk-en/apertium-mk-en.mk.dix
	<!-- personal -->
   <pardef n="personal_pronouns__prn">
     <e>       <p>         <l>јас</l>         <r>free<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>ти</l>         <r>free<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>тој</l>         <r>free<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
     <e r="LR">       <p>         <l>он</l>         <r>free<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>таа</l>         <r>free<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
     <e r="LR">       <p>         <l>она</l>         <r>free<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>тоа</l>         <r>free<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
     <e r="LR">       <p>         <l>оно</l>         <r>free<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>ние</l>         <r>free<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>вие</l>         <r>free<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>тие</l>         <r>free<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
     <e r="LR">       <p>         <l>они</l>         <r>free<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>

     <e>       <p>         <l>мене</l>         <r>free<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>тебе</l>         <r>free<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>него</l>         <r>free<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>неа</l>         <r>free<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>него</l>         <r>free<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>нас</l>         <r>free<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>вас</l>         <r>free<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>нив</l>         <r>free<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>

     <e>       <p>         <l>мене</l>         <r>free<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>тебе</l>         <r>free<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>нему</l>         <r>free<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>нејзе</l>         <r>free<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>нему</l>         <r>free<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>нам</l>         <r>free<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>вам</l>         <r>free<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>ним</l>         <r>free<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="personal_pronouns__clt__prn">
     <e>       <p>         <l>ме</l>         <r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>те</l>         <r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>го</l>         <r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>ја</l>         <r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>го</l>         <r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>не</l>         <r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>нé</l>         <r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>ве</l>         <r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>ги</l>         <r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>

     <e>       <p>         <l>ми</l>         <r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>ти</l>         <r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>му</l>         <r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>и</l>          <r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
     <e r="LR">       <p>         <l>ѝ</l>          <r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>му</l>         <r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>ни</l>         <r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>ви</l>         <r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>им</l>         <r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
	<!-- end personal  -->



	<!-- possessive -->

    <e lm="free"><i/><par n="personal_pronouns__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="clitic"><i/><par n="personal_pronouns__clt__prn"/></e>
